Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6019.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406ww. An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall consider the closure of a health system or the removal of a health system from the insurer's network as a qualifying event for a special enrollment period. As used in this section: (a) "Health system" means an entity or affiliated group of entities under common ownership, governance, or control that operates or manages 1 or more hospitals and may also include physician practices, outpatient facilities, long-term care facilities, laboratories, and other health-care-related operations. (b) "Qualifying event" means that term as described in 45 CFR 155.420. (c) "Special enrollment period" means that term as described in 45 CFR 155.420.